Utah statutes.
23-19-48.   Predator Control Restricted Account -- Contents -- Use of funds.

(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the Predator Control Restricted Account.

(2)  The restricted account includes:

(a)  deposits made to the restricted account from fees established on hunting permits in accordance with Section 23-19-22; and

(b)  any other amount deposited in the restricted account from donations or appropriations.

(3)  Money from the restricted account shall be used by the division to fund a predator control program to control populations of predatory animals that endanger the health of nonpredatory wildlife populations in the state, consistent with the policies of the Wildlife Board.

